Tennessee, session 114, HB1831.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 10-7-504, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
( )
(1) As used in this subsection ( ), unless the context otherwise requires:
(A) "Governmental entity" means this state and any county,
municipality, city, or other political subdivision of this state; and
(B) "Personal identifying information" means a person's home and
work addresses, telephone numbers, and social security number.
(2)
(A) Notwithstanding this part to the contrary and in addition to the
protections established under the Tennessee Information Protection Act,
compiled in title 47, chapter 18, part 33, it is an offense for a person to
use an individual's personal identifying information obtained from a
governmental entity pursuant to this part with the intent to use or sell such
information for commercial use.
(B) Upon the person presenting valid evidence of identification to
the governmental entity or the entity's designee, the person shall sign an
HB1831
010692
- 1 -

affidavit, prescribed by the office of open records counsel, containing the
person's name, signature, and any other information deemed necessary
by the office of open records counsel stating that the information received
will not be used or sold by the person for commercial purposes.
(C)
(i) A violation of subdivision ( )(2)(A) is a Class B
misdemeanor, punishable only by a fine of five hundred dollars
($500).
(ii) It is a separate offense for every individual whose
personal identifying information is used by the person for
commercial purposes in violation of this subsection ( ).
(3) This section does not limit the use of an individual's personal
identifying information for commercial purposes under this subsection ( ) if the
individual expressly authorizes the use of such information.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010692